South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Waterways Protection Act". SECTION 2.  Article 9, Chapter 9, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-9-975.  (A) The South Carolina Waterways Protection Fund is created for the purpose of receiving the three-dollar waterways protection fee that is attached to each tax notice for a watercraft, as provided in Section 12-37-3215. (B) Revenues for the fund must be remitted to the State Treasurer and credited to an account that is separate and distinct from the general fund. Balances in the fund must be retained and carried forward annually and interest earned on balances in the fund must be credited to the fund. (C) The fund must only be used by the department for the following purposes: (1) the removal of hazardous, abandoned, or unattended vessels, marine debris, or hazards to navigation from the waters of the State; (2) identification, marking, and lighting of hazards to navigation in accordance with applicable rules governing aids to navigation; and (3) the development and administration of a grant program to provide funds to applicants, whether public or private, to remove hazardous, abandoned, or unattended vessels, marine debris, or hazards to navigation from the waters of the State. (D) The department must allocate annual fund revenues for use in the four game zones of this State based upon the number of registered and documented watercraft in each game zone. If the department determines a game zone's proportional allocation is not used or obligated by the end of a fiscal year, then it may distribute up to seventy-five percent of the unused and unobligated allocation for use in the other game zones on an as-needed basis. The remaining unused and unobligated allocation must be added to the game zone's proportional allocation for the following fiscal year. For the purpose of this subsection, Game Zone 1 consists of the entirety of Greenville, Oconee, and Pickens Counties and Game Zone 2 consists of no part of Greenville, Oconee, and Pickens Counties. (E) The South Carolina Office of Resilience, upon request from the department, may assist in the development and administration of a grant program established under this section. (F) The department must provide an annual report on its website disclosing expenditures from the fund. SECTION 3.  Article 26, Chapter 37, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-37-3215.  A tax notice for a watercraft must include a waterways protection fee of three dollars. The fee must be deposited by the county treasurer into the South Carolina Waterways Protection Fund, as established in Section 50-9-975. The issuance or renewal of a certificate of number by the Department of Natural Resources is not contingent on the payment of a waterways protection fee. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2025. ----XX----